Virginia statutes. Title 56. Public Service Companies.
Article 5.1. Provision of Certain Communications Services.

§ 56-484.7:1.
Offering of communications services.

A county, city, town, electric commission or board, industrial development authority, or economic development authority, other than one in a locality that (i) is eligible to provide telecommunications services pursuant to §

15.2-2160

and (ii) has a population in excess of 30,000, may offer qualifying communications services, or enter into public-private partnerships to offer such qualifying communications services, in accordance with the provisions
of this article. For purposes of this article, a “qualifying communications service” is a communications service, which shall include but is not limited to, high-speed data service and Internet access service, of general application,
but excluding any cable television or other multi-channel video programming services. The county, city, town, electric commission or board, industrial development authority, or economic development authority shall demonstrate in
its petition that the qualifying communications services do not meet the standard set forth in § 56-484.7:2 within the geographic area specified in the petition. No such services shall be offered unless, prior to offering such
services: (i) the county, city, town, electric commission or board, industrial development authority or economic development authority petitions the Commission to approve the offering of such qualifying communications services
within a specified geographic area and (ii) the Commission, after notice and an opportunity for hearing in the affected area, issues a written order approving the petition or fails to approve or disapprove the petition within 60
days after notice. The 60-day period may be extended by Commission order for a period not to exceed an additional 60 days. The petition shall be deemed approved if the Commission fails to act within 60 days after notice or any
extended period ordered by the Commission.

Each county, city, town, electric commission or board, industrial development authority, or economic development authority that provides communications services pursuant to this article shall provide nondiscriminatory access to for-profit providers of
communications services on a first-come, first-served basis to rights-of-way, poles, conduits or other permanent distribution facilities owned, leased or operated by the county, city, town, electric commission or board, industrial
development authority, or economic development authority unless the facilities have insufficient capacity for such access and additional capacity cannot reasonably be added to the facilities.

The prices charged by a county, city, town, electric commission or board, industrial development authority, or economic development authority for providing communications services shall not be set at a price for the service lower than the prices charged
by any incumbent provider for a functionally equivalent service that is as generally available from such incumbent as it is from such governmental entity.

No county, city, town, electric commission or board, industrial development authority, or economic development authority providing such qualifying communications services shall acquire by eminent domain the facilities or other property of any communications
service provider to offer cable, telephone, data transmission or other information or online programming services.

The Commission may promulgate rules necessary to implement this section.

History.
1999, c. 916; 2002, cc. 479, 489; 2003, cc. 677, 711.

The number of this section
was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 1999 act having been 56-484.12.

Cross references.

As to exclusions under Virginia Freedom of Information Act for proprietary records and trade secrets, see §

2.2-3705.6

.

As to provision of telecommunications services by localities, see §

15.2-2160

.

As to Virginia Wireless Service Authorities Act, see §

15.2-5431.1

et seq.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 479 and 489 are identical, and rewrote this section.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 677 added “but excluding any cable television or other multi-channel video programming services” at the end of the second sentence, substituted “60 days” for “sixty days” near the end of the fourth sentence, substituted “60-day
period” for “sixty-day period” and “60 days” for “sixty days” in the fifth sentence, and substituted “60 days” for “sixty days” in the sixth sentence.

The 2003 amendment by c. 711 designated the existing provisions of the section as subsection A and added subsections B through E; and in subsection A, inserted “other than one in a locality that (i) is eligible to provide telecommunications services pursuant
to §

15.2-2160

and (ii) has a population in excess of 30,000” in the first sentence, substituted “60-day period” for “sixty-day period” and “60 days” for “sixty days” in the fifth sentence, and substituted “60 days” for “sixty days”
in the sixth sentence.

Law Review.

For a symposium, “Convergence: The Future of Technology & Competition Policy,” see 8 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 619 (2000).

For an article, “The Cable Open Access Debate: The Case for a Wholesale Market,” see 8 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 653 (2000).

For an article, “Non-regulation of Advanced Internet Services,” see 8 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 681 (2000).

For an article, “Harmonizing Regulation By Promoting Facilities-Based Competition,” see 8 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 729 (2000).

For a comment, “Cable Open Access: The FCC Should Establish a National Policy of Staying Out of the Way of Broadband Competition,” see 8 Geo. Mason L. Rev. 749 (2000).

For article on developments in the field of Virginia public utility law from June 2002 through May 2003, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 195 (2003).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see
18 M.J. Telegraph and Telephone Companies, § 3.

§ 56-484.7:2.
Approval.

The Commission shall find that it is in the public interest to approve the offering of qualifying communications services as defined in § 56-484.7:1 unless it shall be demonstrated to the Commission and found that, within the geographic area specified
in the petition: (i) the qualifying communications service specified in the petition as provided for in § 56-484.7:1 is readily and generally in the specified geographic area available from each of three or more nonaffiliated companies
and is functionally equivalent for consumers in that specified geographic area to one or more services offered by each of the three or more competitors; (ii) the petition is not in compliance with the requirements of § 56-484.7:1;
or (iii) the offering of the proposed qualifying communications services will not benefit consumers.

History.
1999, c. 916; 2002, cc. 479, 489; 2003, c. 711.

The number of this section
was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 1999 act having been 56-484.13.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 479 and 489 are identical, and rewrote the section.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 711, in clause (i), substituted “generally in the specified geographic area available from each of three or more nonaffiliated companies and is functionally equivalent for consumers in that specified geographic area to one or
more services offered by each of the three or more competitors” for “generally available from three or more nonaffiliated companies in a manner that is functionally and economically equivalent for consumers.”

§ 56-484.7:3.
Repealed by Acts 2002, cc. 479 and 489.

Editor’s note.

Former § 56-484.7:3, pertaining to availability of service by lessee, was enacted by Acts 1999, c. 916, as § 56-484.14, and renumbered as § 56-484.7:3, by the Virginia Code Commission.

§ 56-484.7:4.
Revocation of Commission approval.

The Commission may revoke its approval of a petition under § 56-484.7:1 no earlier than five years after such approval if it finds (i) that the factors described in § 56-484.7:2 on which the approval was based no longer exist or are no longer being satisfied,
or (ii) that the petitioner has not made satisfactory progress toward making generally available the qualifying communications services specified in the petition. If the Commission finds that such approval should be revoked, it shall
determine a date by which the county, city, town, electric commission or board, or authority shall cease to offer such qualifying communications services. In determining such date the Commission shall allow a reasonable time for the
entity to offer its equipment, infrastructure and other assets related to such qualifying communications services for sale at fair market value, which shall be deemed to be no less than the amount of the indebtedness, for such equipment,
infrastructure and other assets related to such qualifying communications services. The provisions of this section shall not apply to the use of telecommunications equipment and services for intragovernmental purposes as specified
in §

15.2-1500

.

History.
2002, cc. 479, 489; 2003, c. 711.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 711 deleted “cost, including” preceding “indebtedness” near the end of the third sentence.